Illinois, session 104th, SB687.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 18-101 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/18-101)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 18-101)7    Sec. 18-101. Creation of fund. A retirement system is 8created to be known as the the "Judges Retirement System of 9Illinois". It shall be a trust separate and distinct from all 10other entities, maintained for the purpose of securing the 11payment of annuities and benefits as prescribed herein.12(Source: Laws 1963, p. 161.)